src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Lithuanian language adjectives compare.

LEXICON ADJ_FIRST_DECLENSION_AS  !! Neuter adjectives also exist, but are less common
!! Singular - Msc
+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>as # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>o # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>am # ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>ą # ;
+Msc+Sg+Inst:%>u # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>ame # ;

! Plural - Msc
+Msc+Pl+Nom:%>i # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen:%>ų # ;
+Msc+Pl+Dat:%>iems # ;
+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>us # ;
+Msc+Pl+Inst:%>ais # ;
+Msc+Pl+Loc:%>uose # ;

!! Singular - Fem
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>a # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>os # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>ai # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>ą # ;
+Fem+Sg+Inst:%>a # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>oje # ;

! Plural - Fem
+Fem+Pl+Nom:%>os # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ų # ;
+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>oms # ;
+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>as # ;
+Fem+Pl+Inst:%>omis # ;
+Fem+Pl+Loc:%>ose # ;

LEXICON ADJ_FIRST_DECLENSION_IAS
:i ADJ_FIRST_DECLENSION_AS ;
