src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Lithuanian language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
šalta+A:šalt ADJ_FIRST_DECLENSION_AS ;
žalia+A:žal^IDIV	ADJ_FIRST_DECLENSION_IAS ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
